Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202018-801
Act, how cited.

Sections 18-801 to 18-825 shall be known and may be cited as the Regional Metropolitan Transit Authority Act.

Laws 2019, LB492, § 1.